Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202044-206
Insurance companies; formation; notice;
publication.

Within the earlier of thirty days after receiving
the certificate of authority to transact business or four months after filing
its articles of incorporation, such corporation shall publish a notice in
some legal newspaper, which notice shall contain the same information, as
far as practicable, as that required under the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 81, p. 429;

R.S.1913, § 3218;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. V, § 4, p. 609;

Laws 1921, c. 305, § 1, p. 963;

C.S.1922, § 7817;

C.S.1929, § 44-404;

R.S.1943, § 44-206;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 48;

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 216;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 281.

Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act, see section 21-201.